Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-709
Dealer agreement; void and unenforceable; when; violations; remedies.

(1) A term of a dealer agreement which is inconsistent with the terms of the Equipment Business Regulation Act is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable and shall not waive any rights which are provided to a person by the act.

(2) A dealer may bring an action against a supplier in any court of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained by the dealer as a consequence of the supplier's violation of the act together with the actual costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees. The dealer may also be granted injunctive relief against unlawful termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or change in competitive circumstances. The remedies authorized by this section shall not be exclusive and shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

Laws 1991, LB 123, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 30.
July 18, 2026